Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE D. STATE PURCHASING AND GENERAL SERVICES

CHAPTER 2176. MAIL

SUBCHAPTER A. EVALUATION AND PLANNING OF MAIL OPERATIONS

Sec. 2176.001. MAIL OPERATIONS OFFICER. A state agency in Travis County shall designate a person to manage mail for the agency's offices and units.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2176.0011. COMPTROLLER POWERS AND DUTIES. The comptroller has under this chapter the powers and duties described by Section 2151.004(d).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.39, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 112, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.002. STATE AGENCY EVALUATION AND IMPROVEMENT OF MAIL OPERATIONS. To improve state agency management of mail and to reduce the state's mail costs, a state agency in the executive branch of state government shall:

(1) evaluate its mail operations to identify and eliminate practices resulting in excessive mail costs; and

(2) develop and implement plans and procedures for making necessary improvements in mail operations.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2176.003. EVALUATION OF STATE AGENCY MAIL OPERATIONS. The comptroller shall:

(1) evaluate the mail operations of state agencies located in Travis County and make recommendations to identify and eliminate practices resulting in excessive mail costs; and

(2) establish minimum objectives and responsibilities for managing mail for the agencies.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 112, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.004. PROCEDURES FOR IMPROVEMENT OF MAIL OPERATIONS. The comptroller shall:

(1) in conjunction with the United States Postal Service, establish procedures to improve the measurement of state agency mail costs, using postage meters or stamps as appropriate;

(2) establish procedures to determine the advantages to state agencies of presorting mail;

(3) establish procedures to determine the lowest cost class of mail necessary to effectively accomplish individual state agency functions;

(4) evaluate the cost-effectiveness of using alternatives to the United States Postal Service for delivering state agency mail;

(5) train state agency personnel regarding cost-effective mailing practices;

(6) set standards for receipt, delivery, collection, and dispatch of mail; and

(7) publish and disseminate standards, guides, and instructions for managing mail and establish and implement procedures for monitoring compliance with the standards, guides, and instructions.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 112, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.005. STATE AGENCY REPORTS ON MAIL OPERATIONS. (a) A state agency in Travis County shall periodically send to the governor a report of its progress in achieving the objectives for and the revisions of mail operations established under Section 2176.004, including an analysis of savings projected from the resulting improvements in managing mail.

(b) When two or more state agencies by interagency contract are providing common services for managing mail, the agencies may designate a single agency to report on behalf of all agencies participating under the contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 573 (S.B. 241), Sec. 1.24, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.006. MAILING LISTS. A state agency in Travis County shall review and consolidate mailing lists used by the agency to distribute publications and other materials issued by the agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. INTERAGENCY MAIL

Sec. 2176.051. INTERAGENCY MAIL SERVICE. (a) The comptroller shall operate a messenger service for delivering unstamped written communications and packages between the following entities located in Travis County:

(1) state agencies;

(2) the legislature; and

(3) legislative agencies.

(b) All entities described by Subsection (a) shall use the service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 113, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.052. USE OF UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE; ALTERNATE DELIVERY METHODS. An entity subject to Section 2176.051 may use a delivery method other than that provided under Section 2176.051 for delivering interagency mail to another entity subject to Section 2176.051 but may not use the United States Postal Service for the delivery unless required to do so under state or federal law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2176.053. DELIVERY OF STATE WARRANTS. State warrants may be delivered in a manner agreed to by the comptroller and the affected agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.40, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. OUTGOING FIRST-CLASS MAIL IN TRAVIS COUNTY

Sec. 2176.101. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to outgoing first-class mail practices of a state agency located in Travis County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2176.102. EVALUATION. The comptroller shall evaluate the outgoing first-class mail practices of state agencies located in Travis County, including the lists, systems, and formats used to create mail.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.103. DISCOUNTED POSTAL RATES. The comptroller shall achieve the maximum available discount on postal rates whenever acceptable levels of timeliness, security, and quality of service can be maintained using the discounted rate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.104. REQUIREMENT TO CONSULT WITH COMPTROLLER. A state agency to which this subchapter applies shall consult the comptroller before the agency may:

(1) purchase, upgrade, or sell mail processing equipment;

(2) contract with a private entity for mail processing; or

(3) take actions that significantly affect the agency's first-class mail practices.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.105. GUIDELINES FOR MEASURING AND ANALYZING FIRST-CLASS MAIL PRACTICES. (a) The comptroller shall adopt and distribute to each state agency to which this subchapter applies guidelines by which outgoing first-class mail practices may be measured and analyzed. The guidelines must require using the services of the United States Postal Service to the extent possible.

(b) The comptroller shall review and update the guidelines at least once every two years, beginning two years after the date on which the guidelines are adopted.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.106. TRAINING. (a) Not later than the 90th day after the date on which the initial guidelines under Section 2176.105 are distributed, and at least annually beginning one year after the date of distribution, the comptroller shall provide training to state agency personnel who handle first-class mail.

(b) The comptroller may use to the extent possible free training provided by the United States Postal Service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.107. PREREQUISITE TO UPGRADING OR REPLACING MAIL EQUIPMENT; COMPARISON AND ANALYSIS. (a) If the comptroller determines that upgrading existing mail production or processing equipment or purchasing new mail production or processing equipment is required to improve outgoing first-class mail practices of the comptroller or another state agency located in Travis County, the comptroller shall prepare a cost-benefit analysis demonstrating that the upgrade or purchase is more cost-effective than contracting with a private entity to provide the equipment or mail service.

(b) The comptroller shall approve the most cost-effective method.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 114, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.109. FEES FOR COMPTROLLER SERVICES. (a) The comptroller by interagency contract shall charge and collect fees from each state agency to which this subchapter applies for the comptroller's services under this subchapter.

(b) The total amount charged a state agency under this section may not exceed the amount of the agency's appropriated funds for outgoing first-class mail, as determined by the Legislative Budget Board, minus the agency's fixed costs for these services.

(c) The comptroller shall transfer to the general revenue fund the amount of a fee charged a state agency under this section that is greater than the amount of the comptroller's actual expenses for performing the services for the agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 115, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 116, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2176.110. RULES. The comptroller shall adopt rules for state agencies to implement this chapter. Before adopting a rule under this section, the comptroller must conduct a public hearing regarding the proposed rule regardless of whether the requirements of Section 2001.029(b) are met.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.41, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. PROCESSING OF MAIL

Sec. 2176.151. TIMELY PROCESSING OF MAIL. Mail shall:

(1) be processed for delivery as quickly as necessary under existing circumstances; and

(2) not be unduly delayed only to achieve a lower postal rate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 2176.152. PROCESSING UNITED STATES MAIL IN CAPITOL COMPLEX. United States mail may be delivered to and from the post office located in the Capitol Complex on agreement between the comptroller and the affected agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 117, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. SPECIAL MAIL SERVICES

Sec. 2176.201. USE OF CERTAIN MAIL SERVICES. (a) Notwithstanding another law that requires the use of certain mail services, a state agency may use any form of mail service available from the United States Postal Service to lower postal costs whenever acceptable levels of accountability, timeliness, security, and quality of service can be maintained.

(b) If practicable, a state agency must use address-matching software that meets certification standards under the Coding Accuracy Support System adopted by the United States Postal Service or that meets any subsequent standard adopted by the United States Postal Service to replace Coding Accuracy Support System standards for preparation of bulk mailings. If a state agency contracts with a provider for bulk mailing services, the contract must require that the provider use address-matching software that meets or exceeds certification standards under the Coding Accuracy Support System or subsequent standards adopted by the United States Postal Service.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1145, Sec. 1, eff. July 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 266), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 2176.202. CHANGE OF ADDRESS SERVICE. Notwithstanding another law regarding change of address updates, a state agency may use any change of address update service approved by the United States Postal Service for the purpose of receiving a postal discount rate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1145, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 2176.203. NOTIFICATION OF SERVICE OPTIONS. The comptroller shall, as part of the guidelines developed under Section 2176.105, provide information to state agencies about special mail services offered by the United States Postal Service. The comptroller shall assist a state agency in determining which service to use, considering the state agency's needs for accountability, timeliness, security, and quality of service.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1145, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 117, eff. September 1, 2019.